Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB438.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the State Agency Regulatory Compliance Officer Act.Section 2. Findings and declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) It is the purpose of this act for agencies to work collaboratively with, instead of acting punitively toward, regulated communities.(2) Agencies should strive to make the regulations which the agencies administer and enforce as clear and easily navigable as possible for regulated communities.(3) In administering a regulation, an agency's primary goal should be to ensure compliance rather than to exact punishment.1234567891011121314151617 Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agency." As defined in section 3 of the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act."Regulated entity." An entity regulated by an agency.Section 4. Powers and duties.Each agency shall have the following powers and duties:(1) To designate an employee as the agency's regulatory compliance officer.(2) To empower the regulatory compliance officer under paragraph (1) to develop agency policies and initiatives to further the purpose of this act, including:(i) Educating affected regulated entities on the implementation of new or amended statutes and regulations prior to the effective date of implementation, to the extent practicable and during implementation.(ii) Establishing clear channels of communication through which regulated entities can contact the agency with questions or concerns regarding regulations.(iii) Working with regulated entities to resolve noncompliance issues before imposition of penalties.(iv) Providing a detailed explanation of each regulatory requirement under the agency's jurisdiction, including expectations for compliance, guidelines for measuring compliance and the primary benefit of each requirement.(3) To empower the regulatory compliance officer to issue to any person, upon the person's request, an opinion 20250SB0438PN0409 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with respect to the person's duties under a regulation of the agency. The following shall apply:(i) The opinion shall be provided within 20 business days of the request, provided that the time may be extended for good cause.(ii) It shall be a complete defense in any enforcement proceeding initiated by the agency and evidence of good faith conduct in any other civil or criminal proceeding if:(A) the requester, at least 20 business days prior to the alleged violation, requested an opinion from the agency's regulatory compliance officer in good faith, disclosed truthfully all the material facts and committed the acts complained of in reliance on the advice in an opinion issued under this paragraph; or(B) the regulatory compliance officer failed to provide an opinion within 20 business days, or any later extended time, of the request and the committed acts complained of were the subject of the request.(4) To empower the regulation compliance officer to establish guidelines for waiving fines or penalties that the officer's agency would be authorized to impose on a regulated entity for a violation of a statute or regulation that the agency enforces if the entity reports a violation to the regulatory compliance officer before a fine or penalty is imposed on the entity. In order to be eligible for a waiver of fines or penalties, the regulated entity must report to the regulatory compliance officer the steps the entity has taken or will take to remedy the violation.20250SB0438PN0409 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) To empower the regulatory compliance officer to request and obtain any information or advice from other staff of the agency that the officer may need to fulfill the duties of the regulation compliance officer position.(6) To establish clear channels of communication through which persons seeking to become a regulated entity can contact the agency with questions or concerns relating to starting a business and future compliance with regulations.Section 5. Annual report.No later than January 31 of each year, each agency shall submit to the General Assembly an annual report detailing all of the following:(1) The progress made by the agency and the regulatory compliance officer in the preceding calendar year toward compliance with this act.(2) The number of regulated entities served.(3) The type of regulated entities served.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0438PN0409 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819